Utah statutes.
32B-4-403.   Unlawful sale, offer for sale, or furnishing to minor.

(1)  A person may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product to a minor.

(2) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person who violates Subsection (1) negligently or recklessly fails to determine whether the recipient of the alcoholic product is a minor.

(ii)  As used in this Subsection (2)(a), "negligently" means with simple negligence.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the person who violates Subsection (1) knows the recipient of the alcoholic product is a minor.

(3)  This section does not apply to the furnishing of an alcoholic product to a minor in accordance with this title:

(a)  for medicinal purposes by:

(i)  the parent or guardian of the minor; or

(ii)  the health care practitioner of the minor, if the health care practitioner is authorized by law to write a prescription; or

(b)  as part of a religious organization's religious services.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

